Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 11 Miscellaneous Provisions

38-2-1135.
Courts of inquiry; composition; parties; report.

Courts of inquiry to investigate any matter of concern to the organized militia may be convened by any person authorized to convene a general court-martial, whether or not the persons involved have requested such an inquiry.

A court of inquiry shall consist of three or more commissioned officers. For each court of inquiry, the convening authority shall also appoint counsel for the court.

Any person subject to this article whose conduct is subject to inquiry shall be designated as a party. Any person subject to this article who has a direct interest in the subject of inquiry has the right to be designated as a party upon request to the court. Any person designated as a party shall be given due notice and has the right to be present, to be represented by counsel, to cross-examine witnesses, and to introduce evidence.

Members of a court of inquiry may be challenged by a party, but only for cause stated to the court.

The members, counsel, the reporter, and interpreters of courts of inquiry shall take an oath to faithfully perform their duties.

Witnesses may be summoned to appear and testify and be examined before courts of inquiry as provided for courts-martial.

Courts of inquiry shall make findings of fact but shall not express opinions or make recommendations unless required to do so by the convening authority.

Each court of inquiry shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall be authenticated by the signatures of the president and counsel for the court and forwarded to the convening authority. If the record cannot be authenticated by the president, it shall be signed by a member in lieu of the president. If the record cannot be authenticated by the counsel for the court, it shall be signed by a member in lieu of the counsel.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1135

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Vesting of efficiency and medical examining boards with powers of courts of inquiry and courts-martial, §

38-2-216

.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 935

.

38-2-1136.
Authority to administer oaths; limitations; effect of signature.

The following persons shall have the power to administer oaths for the purposes of military administration, including military justice:

All judge advocates;

All summary courts-martial;

All adjutants, assistant adjutants, acting adjutants, and personnel adjutants;

All commanding officers of the naval militia; and

All other persons designated by regulations of the armed forces of the United States or by law.

The following persons shall have the power to administer oaths necessary in the performance of their duties:

The president, military judge, and trial counsel for all general and special courts-martial;

The president and the counsel for the court of any court of inquiry;

All officers designated to take a deposition;

All persons detailed to conduct an investigation;

All recruiting officers; and

All other persons designated by regulations of the armed forces of the United States or by law.

The signature without seal of any such person provided for by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, together with the title of his or her office, is prima facie evidence of the person’s authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1136

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 936

.

38-2-1136.1.
Marshals; duties, powers, immunities.

Military judges may appoint and, at any time, remove one or more marshals who shall execute any process, mandate, or order issued by the judge and shall perform all acts and duties by this chapter imposed on or authorized to be performed by any sheriff as defined in Code Section 15-16-10.

All such marshals shall be deemed peace officers and for the purposes of this article shall have all the powers and immunities of peace officers.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1136.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1137.
Explanation of Code sections to enlisted personnel.

The Code sections specified in paragraph (3) of this subsection shall be carefully explained to each enlisted member at the time of, or within 90 days after, the member’s initial entrance into a duty status with the organized militia.

Such articles as provided for by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be explained again:

After the member has completed basic or recruit training; and

At the time when the member reenlists.

This subsection shall apply with respect to this Code section and Code Sections 38-2-1002 through 38-2-1005, 38-2-1007 through 38-2-1014, 38-2-1015, 38-2-1025, 38-2-1027, 38-2-1031, 38-2-1037, 38-2-1038, 38-2-1055, 38-2-1077 through 38-2-1134, 38-2-1138, and 38-2-1139.

The text of this article and of the regulations prescribed hereunder shall be made available to a member of the organized militia, upon request by the member, for the member’s personal examination.

Failure to provide the explanations of this article as provided for by this Code section shall not be a defense to a court-martial proceeding, the administration of nonjudicial punishment, or any other action.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1137

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 937

.

38-2-1138.
Complaints of wrongs by commanding officers.

Any member of the organized militia who believes himself or herself wronged by a commanding officer and who, upon due application to that commanding officer, is refused redress may complain to the assistant adjutant general for army, the assistant adjutant general for air, or the brigadier general in charge of the State Defense Force, as applicable, who shall forward the complaint to the senior force commander over the officer against whom such complaint is made. The senior force commander shall examine into the complaint and take proper measures for redressing the wrong complained of and shall, as soon as possible, send to the adjutant general a true statement of such complaint with the proceedings had thereon. Any complaint against a senior force commander shall be made to the adjutant general who shall examine into the complaint and take proper measures for redressing the wrong complained of.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1138

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1138.1.
State administrative letter of reprimand.

The adjutant general, assistant adjutant general for army, or assistant adjutant general for air may issue to any member under his or her authority a state administrative letter of reprimand.

A state administrative letter of reprimand shall not be filed in the member’s federal personnel records unless it meets the requirements for filing under the applicable regulations or instructions of the affected member.

A state administrative letter of reprimand shall be included for consideration when determining future assignments within the state for the affected member.

The member against whom a state administrative letter of reprimand is issued shall have the same rights to review evidence and present a rebuttal as he or she would have if the state administrative letter of reprimand were to be filed in his or her federal personnel file.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1138.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 938

.

38-2-1139.
Redress of injuries to private property; complaint; investigating board; assessment.

Whenever a complaint is made to any commanding officer that willful damage has been done to the property of any person or that the person’s property has been wrongfully taken by members of the organized militia, such commanding officer may, under such regulations prescribed pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter, convene a board to investigate the complaint. The board shall consist of from one to three commissioned officers and, for the purpose of that investigation, it has power to summon witnesses and examine them upon oath, to receive depositions or other documentary evidence, and to assess the damages sustained against the responsible parties. The assessment of damages made by the board shall be subject to the approval of the commanding officer and, in the amount approved by such commanding officer, shall be charged against the pay of the offenders. The order of the commanding officer directing charges authorized by this Code section shall be conclusive on any disbursing officer for payment to the injured parties of the damages so assessed and approved.

If the offenders cannot be ascertained but the organization or detachment to which they belong is known, charges totaling the amount of damages assessed and approved may be made in such proportion as may be considered just upon the individual members thereof who are shown to have been present at the scene at the time the damages complained of were inflicted, as determined by the approved findings of the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1139

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 38/HB 323.

Cross references.

Destruction of property other than military property generally, § 38-2-541.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 939

.

38-2-1140.
Delegation of authority by Governor.

Except as provided in Code Section 38-2-1022, the Governor may delegate any authority vested in the Governor under this article and provide for the subdelegation of any such authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1140

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 38/HB 737.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 940

.

38-2-1141.
Fees and authorized travel expenses of witnesses, victims, court reporters, and interpreters.

The fees and authorized travel expenses of all witnesses, experts, victims, court reporters, and interpreters, fees for the service of process, the costs of collection, apprehension, detention, and confinement, and all other necessary expenses of prosecution and the administration of military justice, not otherwise payable by any other source, shall be paid out of the military fund as described in Code Section 38-2-170.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1141

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1142.
Fines for contempt; methods of collection and payment.

Fines collected as a result of being found in contempt shall be collected in the following manner:

By cash or money order;

By retention of any pay or allowances due or to become due to the person fined from another state or the United States; or

By garnishment or levy, together with costs, on the wages, goods, and chattels of a person delinquent in paying a fine, as provided by law.

Any sum so received or retained shall be deposited in the military justice fund as provided in Code Section 38-2-170.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1142

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1143.
Construction with the federal Uniform Code of Military Justice.

This article shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make it uniform, so far as practical, with the Uniform Code of Military Justice, Chapter 47 of Title 10 of the United States Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1143

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1144.
Immunity.

All persons acting under the provisions of this article, whether as a member of the military or as a civilian, shall be immune from any personal liability for any of the acts or omissions which they did or failed to do as part of their duties under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1144

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1145.
Severability.

The provisions of this article are hereby declared to be severable, and if any provision of this article or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1145

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.